Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1988 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1988, 2000, 2010, and 2018 to make other minor word changes.

In 1971 “secretary of state” was changed to “lieutenant governor” throughout the title in conformity with the 1970 Alaska constitutional amendment (SJR 2) changing the designation of that office.

Administrative Code. —

For elections, see 6 AAC, part 1.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 113, SLA 2003 (House Bill 266), see 2003 House Journal 965 — 969.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 2, FSSLA 2005 (HB 94), the basis of a number of the 2005 amendments to this title, see 2005 House Journal 118 — 125.